Alabama, session 2026rs, SB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
55 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
56 the Home Schooling Opportunities for Military Education (HOME)
Page 2

the Home Schooling Opportunities for Military Education (HOME)
SB191 INTRODUCED
57 Act.
58 Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
59 following terms have the following meanings:
60 (1) BONA FIDE CHANGE IN DUTY STATION OR RESIDENCE. A
61 required relocation pursuant to military orders, whether
62 temporary or permanent, that necessitates that the service
63 member obtain lodging outside the normal commuting area of the
64 member's principal residence.
65 (2) COVERED MILITARY SERVICE. Active duty military
66 service by a member of the Armed Forces of the United States,
67 including a member of the reserve components or the Alabama
68 National Guard, who is:
69 a. Serving on active duty under federal authority; or
70 b. Serving on active duty under state authority
71 pursuant to an order of the Governor or other lawful state
72 authority, when the service requires a bona fide change in
73 duty station or residence.
74 (b) Any parent who is a member of the Armed Forces of
75 the United States and performing covered military service who
76 moves into a new school system and begins home instruction
77 after the school year has begun, shall notify as soon as
78 practicable the local superintendent of education of his or
79 her intention to home school his or her dependent child and,
80 within 30 days after providing notice, shall comply with all
81 state requirements for home schooling. The local
82 superintendent of education may require the parent to provide
83 a copy of his or her permanent change of station orders to
84 substantiate the move.
Page 3

substantiate the move.
SB191 INTRODUCED
85 (c) A student who is the dependent of a member of the
86 Armed Forces of the United States performing covered military
87 service and is home schooled may use public school facilities
88 and equipment on the same basis as regularly enrolled students
89 if all of the following conditions are satisfied:
90 (1) The use does not disrupt regular school activities.
91 (2) The use is approved by the school principal in
92 accordance with local board of education policy.
93 (3) The use does not create any additional expense for
94 the school.
95 (4) The use is directly related to the academic program
96 of the student.
97 (5) The use of potentially hazardous areas including,
98 but not limited to, shops, laboratories, and the gymnasium, is
99 supervised by a designated employee of the school
100 administrative staff.
101 (d) A local school system shall provide a genuine
102 opportunity for home school students with disabilities, who
103 are the dependents of a member of the Armed Forces of the
104 United States performing covered military service, to access
105 special education and related services from the school system
106 within which they reside. This subsection shall not be
107 construed as conferring the procedural protections and rights
108 under Part B of the Individuals with Disabilities Education
109 Act (IDEA) to those students and their parents or guardians.
110 The State Board of Education shall adopt rules as necessary to
111 implement this subsection.
112 Section 3. Section 16-1-52.1 of the Code of Alabama
Page 4

Section 3. Section 16-1-52.1 of the Code of Alabama
SB191 INTRODUCED
113 1975, is amended to read as follows:
114 "§16-1-52.1
115 (a) For the purposes of this section, the term
116 "athletic association" means any following terms have the
117 following meanings:
118 (1) ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION. Any athletic organization
119 operating in this state that has authority over its member
120 institutions' athletic programs, that receives public funds in
121 any form, and whose member institutions make use of public
122 facilities.
123 (2) BONA FIDE CHANGE IN DUTY STATION OR RESIDENCE. A
124 required relocation pursuant to military orders, whether
125 temporary or permanent, that necessitates the service member
126 to obtain lodging outside the normal commuting area of the
127 member's principal residence.
128 (3) COVERED MILITARY SERVICE. Active duty military
129 service by a member of the Armed Forces of the United States,
130 including a member of the reserve components or the Alabama
131 National Guard, who is:
132 a. Serving on active duty under federal authority; or
133 b. Serving on active duty under state authority
134 pursuant to an order of the Governor or other lawful state
135 authority, when the service requires a bona fide change in
136 duty station or residence.
137 (b)(1) No public K-12 school may deny a dependent child
138 of a full-time active duty military parent immediate
139 eligibility to participate in an interscholastic athletic
140 contest on the basis of the child enrolling in a new school
Page 5

contest on the basis of the child enrolling in a new school
SB191 INTRODUCED
141 due to the child and his or her parent making a bona fide move
142 pursuant to permanent change of station orders received by the
143 parent, regardless of the date upon which the child enrolls in
144 the new school within the school attendance zone of the bona
145 fide move.
146 (2) A public K-12 school and an athletic association
147 may require a parent to provide his or her permanent change of
148 station orders to substantiate a bona fide move that
149 necessitates a child's enrollment in a new school.
150 (c) No local school system or athletic association may
151 deny a high school equivalency student, a home school student,
152 or a charter school student, whose parent is a member of the
153 Armed Forces of the United States performing covered military
154 service, and who does not have access to interscholastic
155 activities, the opportunity to participate in all
156 interscholastic activities available in the school system
157 within which the student resides, if the student otherwise
158 satisfies all other requirements of the local school system
159 and athletic association, with the exception of class
160 attendance requirements."
161 Section 4. This act shall become effective on July 1,
162 2026.
Page 6